Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1876YH (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 839 Section 1. Section 43.18, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 10. A statement that the candidate is aware 3 that if the candidate is elected to the general assembly, a 4 county board of supervisors, or a city council, the candidate 5 may request the candidateâs home address be excluded from 6 official publications pursuant to section 70A.40. 7 Sec. 2. Section 43.22, Code 2025, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 43.22 Nominations certified ââ publication of home address 10 prohibited . 11 1. The state commissioner shall, at least sixty-nine 12 days before a primary election, or as soon as practicable if 13 an objection under section 43.24 is pending, furnish to the 14 commissioner of each county a certificate under the state 15 commissionerâs hand and seal, which certificate shall show: 16 1. a. The name and post office address of each person 17 for whom a nomination paper has been filed in the state 18 commissionerâs office, and for whom the voters of said county 19 have the right to vote at said election. 20 2. b. The office for which such person is a candidate. 21 3. c. The political party from which such person seeks a 22 nomination. 23 2. The state commissioner shall not publish the home 24 address of a candidate in any associated publicly available 25 publication. 26 Sec. 3. Section 43.67, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 27 by adding the following new paragraph: 28 NEW PARAGRAPH . j. A statement that the candidate is aware 29 that if the candidate is elected to the general assembly, a 30 county board of supervisors, or a city council, the candidate 31 may request the candidateâs home address be excluded from 32 official publications pursuant to section 70A.40. 33 Sec. 4. Section 44.3, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended by 34 adding the following new paragraph: 35 -1- LSB 1876YH (3) 91 sc/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 839 NEW PARAGRAPH . j. A statement that the candidate is aware 1 that if the candidate is elected to the general assembly, a 2 county board of supervisors, or a city council, the candidate 3 may request the candidateâs home address be excluded from 4 official publications pursuant to section 70A.40. 5 Sec. 5. Section 45.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 10. A statement that the candidate is aware 8 that if the candidate is elected to the general assembly, a 9 county board of supervisors, or a city council, the candidate 10 may request the candidateâs home address be excluded from 11 official publications pursuant to section 70A.40. 12 Sec. 6. Section 70A.40, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. Upon an elective public officerâs 15 request, the governmental entity the officer serves shall 16 exclude the officerâs home address from all official 17 publications. 18